Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 4.1. Out-of-State Political Committees.

§§ 24.2-949.9:1 through 24.2-949.9:4.
Renumbered.

Editor’s note.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, §§

24.2-949.9:1

through 24.2-949.9:4 were renumbered as §§

24.2-949.10

through

24.2-949.13

.

§ 24.2-949.10.
Out-of-state political committees; statements of organization.

Out-of-state political committees shall submit a statement of organization on or before the date on which the committee makes contributions of $10,000 or more in the aggregate in a calendar year to candidate campaign committees or political committees registered with the State Board of Elections.

The statement of organization shall include information as required pursuant to subsection B of §

24.2-949.2

except that the committee shall not be required to establish a depository account in a financial institution in the Commonwealth.

In addition to the information required pursuant to §

24.2-949.2

, the committee shall include on its statement of organization (i) its taxpayer identification number, (ii) the federal and state agencies with which it is required to file financial disclosure information, and (iii) the registration number assigned to it by each agency listed under clause (ii).

On the same day that an out-of-state political committee submits its statement of organization to the State Board, (i) it shall file a list of each contributor who has contributed to the committee $2,500 or more in the aggregate between the immediately preceding January 1 and the date on which the statement of organization is filed with the contributor’s name, address, occupation, employer, and place of business and the dates and amounts of the contributor’s contributions during the period covered by the report; and (ii) it shall file a report of the contributions it has made to candidate campaign committees or political committees registered with the State Board between the immediately preceding January 1 and the date on which the statement of organization is filed.

Any political organization as defined in § 527 of the United States Internal Revenue Code that is shown on the list of contributors required by this section and that has contributed $50,000 or more to the committee filing the list of contributors required by this section shall be required to file a statement of organization and the lists of its contributors and its contributions as provided in subsection D.

History.

2006, cc. 771, 805, § 24.2-908.2.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission. Acts 2006, cc. 771 and 805 enacted this section as § 24.2-908.2. It was subsequently renumbered by the Virginia Code Commission, first as §

24.2-949.9:1

to conform to the enactment of the Campaign Finance Disclosure Act of 2006, Acts 2006, cc. 787, 892, and then as this section to conform to the numbering conventions set forth by the Code Commission.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, cc. 771 and 805 enacted § 24.2-908.2, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2006, cc. 771 and 805 have been given effect in this section as set out.

§ 24.2-949.11.
Out-of-state political committees; reporting requirements.

The provisions of this section are applicable only to out-of-state political committees.

After the committee has met the requirements of §

24.2-949.10

and upon making any contribution to a candidate campaign committee or political committee registered in Virginia, the committee shall report its contributions and contributors in accordance with subsection C to the State Board of Elections by computer or electronic means as prescribed in §

24.2-946.1

.

The report required by subsection B shall include (i) a report of the contributions the committee has made to candidate campaign committees or political committees in the Commonwealth since the filing of a report of its contributions pursuant to subsection D of §

24.2-949.10

or this subsection during the period covered by the report and (ii) a list of each contributor who has contributed to the committee $2,500 or more in the aggregate since the filing of a list of its contributors pursuant to subsection D of §

24.2-949.10

or this subsection with the contributor’s name, address, occupation, employer, and place of business and the dates and amounts of the contributor’s contributions during the period covered by the report.

Upon transfer of a designated contribution to a designated candidate’s campaign committee, the committee shall provide information to the campaign committee to identify the contributor as provided by §

24.2-947.4

.

The reporting requirements of this section shall continue in effect for each committee until a final report is filed that sets forth all contributions and expenditures not previously reported. The final report shall include a termination statement, signed by an officer of the committee, that all reporting is complete and final.

History.

2006, cc. 771, 805, § 24.2-910.2; 2008, cc. 152, 289.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission. Acts 2006, cc. 771 and 805 enacted this section as § 24.2-910.2. It was subsequently renumbered by the Virginia Code Commission, first as § 24.2-949.9:2 to conform to the enactment of the Campaign Finance Disclosure Act of 2006, Acts 2006, cc. 787, 892, and then as this section to conform to the numbering conventions set forth by the Code Commission.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, cc. 771 and 805 enacted § 24.2-910.2, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2006, cc. 771 and 805 have been given effect in this section as set out.

At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, substituted “§

24.2-949.10

” for “§

24.2-949.9:1

” in three places.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendments by cc. 152 and 289, effective January 1, 2009, are identical, and added subsection D; and redesignated former subsection D as subsection E.

§ 24.2-949.12.
Out-of-state political committees; additional requirements.

Prior to accepting contributions of $10,000 or more in the aggregate in any calendar year from any other out-of-state political committee, an out-of-state political committee shall (i) request its State Board of Elections registration number from that other out-of-state political committee and (ii) verify that number with the State Board.

History.

2006, cc. 771, 805, § 24.2-910.3.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission. Acts 2006, cc. 771 and 805 enacted this section as § 24.2-910.3. It was subsequently renumbered by the Virginia Code Commission, first as § 24.2-949.9:3 to conform to the enactment of the Campaign Finance Disclosure Act of 2006, Acts 2006, cc. 787, 892, and then as this section to conform to the numbering conventions set forth by the Code Commission.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, cc. 771 and 805 enacted § 24.2-910.3, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2006, cc. 771 and 805 have been given effect in this section as set out.

§ 24.2-949.13.
Certain contributions received from federal political action and out-of-state political committees; political committee responsibilities.

Prior to accepting contributions of $10,000 or more in the aggregate in any calendar year from any one federal political action committee or out-of-state political committee, a political committee shall (i) request the federal political action committee’s or out-of-state political committee’s State Board of Elections registration number from the committee and (ii) verify that number with the State Board.

History.

2006, cc. 771, 805, § 24.2-910.4.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission. Acts 2006, cc. 771 and 805 enacted this section as § 24.2-910.4. It was subsequently renumbered by the Virginia Code Commission, first as § 24.2-949.9:4 to conform to the enactment of the Campaign Finance Disclosure Act of 2006, Acts 2006, cc. 787, 892, and then as this section to conform to the numbering conventions set forth by the Code Commission.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2006, cc. 771 and 805 enacted § 24.2-910.4, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2006, cc. 771 and 805 have been given effect in this section as set out.